North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-142.2.
Presentation at a hospital for mental health treatment.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Assessment. — A comprehensive clinical assessment, psychiatric evaluation, or a substantially equivalent assessment.

Director. — The director of the department of social services in the county in which the juvenile resides or is found, or the director’s representative as authorized in

G.S. 108A-14

.

If a juvenile in the custody of a department of social services presents to a hospital emergency department for mental health treatment, the director shall contact the appropriate LME/MCO or prepaid health plan within 24 hours of the determination that the juvenile should not remain at the hospital and no appropriate placement is immediately available, to request an assessment.

Consistent with the care coordination responsibilities under G.S. 122C-115.4(b)(5), the LME/MCO or prepaid health plan must, when applicable or required by their contract with the Department, arrange for an assessment performed by either the juvenile’s clinical home provider; the hospital, if able and willing; or other qualified licensed clinician within five business days following notification from the director.

Based on the findings and recommendations of the assessment, all of the following must occur:

If the comprehensive clinical assessment recommends a traditional foster home or a Level I group home, the director shall identify and provide the placement within five business days. The county department of social services shall be responsible for transporting the juvenile to the identified placement within five business days.

If the assessment recommends a level of care requiring prior authorization by the LME/MCO or prepaid health plan, the LME/MCO or prepaid health plan shall authorize an appropriate level of care and identify appropriate providers within five business days and assign a care coordinator for the duration that the LME/MCO or prepaid health plan provides services to the juvenile. Once an appropriate level of care has been authorized and providers identified, the director shall place the juvenile in the appropriate placement within five business days. The county department of social services shall be responsible for transporting the juvenile to the identified placement.

The county department of social services shall provide ongoing case management, virtually or in person, to address the juvenile’s educational and social needs during the juvenile’s stay in the hospital. The hospital shall cooperate with the county department of social services to provide access to the juvenile during the juvenile’s stay in the hospital.

If, on completion of the assessment, the director under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or LME/MCO or prepaid health plan under subdivision (d)(2) of this section is unable to identify an appropriate available placement or provider for the juvenile, or if the assessment recommendations differ, the director shall immediately notify the Department of Health and Human Services’ Rapid Response Team. The director, pursuant to G.S. 7B-302(a1)(1), is authorized to disclose confidential information to the Rapid Response Team to ensure the juvenile is protected from abuse or neglect and for the provision of protective services to the juvenile. All confidential information disclosed to the Rapid Response Team shall remain confidential, shall not be further redisclosed unless authorized by State or federal law or regulations, and shall not be considered a public record. Notification to the Rapid Response Team does not relieve the director, LME/MCO, prepaid health plan, or any other entity from carrying out their responsibilities to the juvenile.

The Rapid Response Team shall be comprised of representatives of the Department of Health and Human Services from the Division of Social Services; the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services; and the Division of Health Benefits. Upon receipt of a notification from a director, the Rapid Response Team shall evaluate the information provided and coordinate a response to address the immediate needs of the juvenile, which may include any of the following:

Identifying an appropriate level of care for the juvenile.

Identifying appropriate providers or other placement for the juvenile.

Making a referral to qualified services providers.

Developing an action plan to ensure the needs of the juvenile are met.

Developing a plan to ensure that relevant parties carry out any responsibilities to the juvenile.

History.

2021-132, s. 5(a).

§ 122C-143.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220.

§ 122C-143.1.
Policy guidance.

The General Assembly shall, as it considers necessary, endorse as policy guidance long-range plans for the broad age/disability categories of persons to be served and the services to be provided by area authorities.

The Secretary shall develop a payment policy that designates, within broad age/disability categories, the priority populations, based on their disability level and the types of service to be supported by State resources. The Secretary shall review the Department’s payment policy annually to assure that payments are made consistent with the State’s long-range plans.

The Secretary shall ensure that the payment policy provides incentives designated to target resources consistent with legislative policy and with the State’s long-range plans and to promote equal accessibility to services for individuals regardless of their catchment area.

Upon request of the Secretary, each area authority shall develop, revise, or amend its local long-range plans to be consistent with the policy guidance set forth in the State’s long-range plans. Local service implementation plans shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary.

The Secretary shall ensure that the Department’s requests for expansion funds for area authorities are consistent with the State’s long-range plans and include consideration of needs identified by the area authorities and their local plans.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(e).

§ 122C-143.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.16, effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-144.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220(d), effective July 1, 1993.

§ 122C-144.1.
Budget format and reports.

The area authority shall maintain its budget in accordance with the requirements of Article 3 of Subchapter III of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

The Secretary may require periodic reports of receipts and expenditures for all area authority services provided directly or under contract according to a format prescribed by the Secretary.

In accordance with

G.S. 159-34

, the area authority shall have an audit completed and submit it to the Local Government Commission.

The Secretary may require reports of client characteristics, staffing patterns, agency policies or activities, services, or specific financial data of the area authority, but the reports shall not identify individual clients of the area authority unless specifically required by State statute or federal statute or regulation, or unless valid consent for the release has been given by the client or legally responsible person.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(g).

§ 122C-145.
[Repealed]

Renumbered as

G.S. 122C-151.2

by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220.

§ 122C-146.
Uniform co-payment schedule.

The LME and its contractual provider agencies shall implement the co-payment schedule based on family income adopted by the Secretary under G.S. 122C-112.1(a)(34). The LME is responsible for determining the applicability of the co-payment to individuals authorized by the LME to receive services. An LME that provides services and its contractual provider agencies shall also make every reasonable effort to collect appropriate reimbursement for costs in providing these services from individuals or entities able to pay, including insurance and third-party payments. However, no individual may be refused services because of an inability to pay.

Individuals may not be charged for free services, as required in “The Amendments to the Education of the Handicapped Act”, P.L. 99-457, provided to eligible infants and toddlers and their families. This exemption from charges does not exempt insurers or other third-party payors from being charged for payment for these services, if the person who is legally responsible for any eligible infant or toddler is first advised that the person may or may not grant permission for the insurer or other payor to be billed for the free services.

All funds collected from co-payments for LME operated services shall be used to provide services to individuals in targeted populations.The collection of co-payments by an LME that provides services may not be used as justification for reduction or replacement of the budgeted commitment of local tax revenue. All funds collected from co-payments by contractual provider agencies shall be used to provide services to individuals in targeted populations.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, s. 16; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1003, s. 4; 1991, c. 215, s. 2; 1993, c. 487, s. 3; c. 553, s. 36; 2007-410, s. 1.

§ 122C-147.
Financing and title of area authority property.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220(i).

Unless otherwise specified by the Secretary, State appropriations to area authorities shall be used exclusively for the operating costs of the area authority; provided however:

The Secretary may specify that designated State funds may be used by area authorities (i) for the purchase, alteration, improvement, or rehabilitation of real estate to be used as a facility or (ii) in contracting with a private, nonprofit corporation or with another governmental entity that operates facilities for the mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or substance abusers and according to the terms of the contract between the area authority and the private, nonprofit corporation or with the governmental entity, for the purchase, alteration, improvement, rehabilitation of real estate or, to make a lump sum down payment or periodic payments on a real property mortgage in the name of the private, nonprofit corporation or governmental entity.

Upon cessation of the use of the facility by the area authority, if operated by the area authority, or upon termination, default, or nonrenewal of the contract if operated by a contractual agency, the Department shall be reimbursed in accordance with rules adopted by the Secretary for the Department’s participation in the purchase of the facility.

All real property purchased for use by the area authority shall be provided by local or federal funds unless otherwise allowed under subsection (b) of this section or by specific capital funds appropriated by the General Assembly. The title to this real property and the authority to acquire it is held by the area authority. Real property may not be acquired by means of an installment contract under

G.S. 160A-20

unless the Local Government Commission has approved the acquisition. No deficiency judgment may be rendered against any unit of local government in any action for breach of a contractual obligation authorized by this subsection, and the taxing power of a unit of local government is not and may not be pledged directly or indirectly to secure any moneys due under a contract authorized by this subsection.

The area authority may lease real property.

Equipment necessary for the operation of the area authority may be obtained with local, State, federal, or donated funds, or a combination of these.

The area authority may acquire or lease personal property. An acquisition may be accomplished by an installment contract under

G.S. 160A-20

or by a lease-purchase agreement. An area authority may not acquire personal property by means of an installment contract under

G.S. 160A-20

without the approval of the board or boards of commissioners of all the counties that comprise the area authority. The approval of a board of county commissioners shall be by resolution of the board and may have any necessary or proper conditions, including provisions for distribution of the proceeds in the event of disposition of the property by the area authority. The area authority may not acquire personal property by means of an installment contract under G.S. 160A-20 without the approval of the Local Government Commission, when required by that statute. No deficiency judgment may be rendered against any unit of local government in any action for breach of a contractual obligation authorized by this subsection, and the taxing power of a unit of local government is not and shall not be pledged directly or indirectly to secure any moneys due under a contract authorized by this subsection. Title to personal property may be held by the area authority.

All area authority funds shall be spent in accordance with the rules of the Secretary. Failure to comply with the rules is grounds for the Secretary to stop participation in the funding of the particular program. The Secretary may withdraw funds from a specific program of services not being administered in accordance with an approved plan and budget after written notice and subject to an appeal as provided by

G.S. 122C-145

and Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section and in addition to the purposes listed in that subsection, the funds allocated by the Secretary for services for members of the class identified in Willie M., et al. vs. Hunt, et al. (C-C-79-294, Western District) may be used for the purchase, alteration, improvement, or rehabilitation of real property owned or to be owned by a nonprofit corporation or by another governmental entity and used or to be used as a facility.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section and in addition to the purposes listed in that subsection, funds allocated by the Secretary for services for members of the class identified in Willie M., et al. vs. Hunt, et al. (C-C-79-294, Western District) may be used for the purchase, alteration, improvement, or rehabilitation of real property used by an area authority as long as the title to the real property is vested in the county where the property is located or is vested in another governmental entity. If the property ceases to be used in accordance with the annual plan, the unamortized part of funds spent under this subsection for the purchase, alteration, improvement, or rehabilitation of real property shall be returned to the Department, in accordance with the rules of the Secretary.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section the area authority, with the approval of the Secretary, may use local funds for the alteration, improvement, and rehabilitation of real property owned by a nonprofit corporation or by another governmental entity under contract with the area authority and used or to be used as a facility. Prior to the use of county appropriated funds for this purpose, the area authority shall obtain consent of the board or boards of commissioners of all the counties that comprise the area authority. The consent shall be by resolution of the affected board or boards of county commissioners and may have any necessary or proper conditions, including provisions for distribution of the proceeds in the event of disposition of the property.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 613; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 29; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 5; c. 25; c. 402; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 720, s. 3; c. 784; 1989, c. 625, s. 17; 1993, c. 321, s. 220(h), (i); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 592, s. 1; 1995, c. 305, s. 1; 2012-151, s. 8.

§ 122C-147.1.
Appropriations and allocations.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, funds shall be appropriated by the General Assembly in broad age/disability categories. The Secretary shall allocate and account for funds in broad age/disability categories so that the area authority may, with flexibility, earn funds in response to local needs that are identified within the payment policy developed in accordance with G.S. 122C-143.1(b).

When the General Assembly determines that it is necessary to appropriate funds for a more specific purpose than the broad age/disability category, the Secretary shall determine whether expenditure accounting, special reporting within earning from a broad fund, the Memorandum of Agreement, or some other mechanism allows the best accounting for the funds.

(b1)

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, funds appropriated by the General Assembly for crisis services shall not be allocated in broad disability or age/disability categories. Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to funds appropriated by the General Assembly for crisis services.

Funds that have been appropriated by the General Assembly for a more specific purpose than specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be converted to a broad age/disability category at the beginning of the second biennium following the appropriation, unless otherwise acted upon by the General Assembly.

The Secretary shall allocate funds to area programs:

To be earned in a purchase of service basis, at negotiated reimbursement rates, for services that are included in the payment policy and delivered to mentally ill, developmentally disabled, and substance abuse clients and for services that are included in the payment policy to other recipients; or

To be paid under a grant on the basis of agreed-upon expenditures, when the Secretary determines that it would be impractical to pay on a purchase of service basis.

(d1)

Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (d) of this section, each area program shall determine whether to earn the funds for crisis services and funds for services to substance abuse clients in a purchase-for-service basis, under a grant, or some combination of the two. Area programs shall account for funds expended on a grant basis according to procedures required by the Secretary and in a manner that is similar to funds expended in a purchase-for-service basis.

After the close of a fiscal year, final payments of funds shall be made:

Under the purchase of service basis, on the earnings of the area authority for the delivery to individuals within each age/disability group, of any services that are consistent with the payment policy established in G.S. 122C-143.1(b), up to the final allocation amount; or

When awarded on an expenditure basis, on allowable actual expenditures, up to the final allocation amount.Under rules adopted by the Secretary, final payments shall be adjusted on the basis of the audit required in G.S. 122C-144.1(d).

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(j); 2007-323, ss. 10.49(b), (q).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, ss. 10.49(b) and 10.49(q), effective July 1, 2007, added subsections (b1) and (d1).

§ 122C-147.2.
Purchase of services and reimbursement rates.

When funds are used to purchase services, the following provisions apply:

Reimbursement rates for specific types of service shall be negotiated between the Secretary and the area authority. The negotiation shall begin with the rate determined by a standardized cost-finding and rate-setting procedure approved by the Secretary.

The reimbursement rate used for the payment of services shall incorporate operating and administrative costs, including costs for property in accordance with

G.S. 122C-147

.

To ensure uniformity in rates charged to area programs and funded with State-allocated resources, the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services of the Department of Health and Human Services may require a private agency that provides services under contract with an area program or county program, except for hospital services that have an established Medicaid rate, to complete an agency-wide uniform cost finding in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. The resulting cost shall be the maximum included for the private agency in the contracting area program’s unit cost finding. If a private agency fails to timely and accurately complete the required agency-wide uniform cost finding in a manner acceptable to the Department’s controller’s office, the Department may suspend all Department funding and payment to the private agency until such time as an acceptable cost finding has been completed by the private agency and approved by the Department’s controller’s office.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(j); 2005-276, s. 10.30.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.30, effective July 1, 2005, designated the previously undesignated introductory paragraph as subsection (a); in subdivision (a)(1), deleted “that is required by G.S. 122C-143.2(a) or by another method” following “procedure”; added subsection (b), and made a minor stylistic change.

§§ 122C-148 through 122C-150.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220.

§ 122C-151.
Responsibilities of those receiving appropriations.

All resources allocated to and received by any area authority and used for programs of mental health, developmental disabilities, substance abuse or other related services are subject to the conditions specified in this Article and to the rules of the Commission and the Secretary and to the conditions of the Memorandum of Agreement specified in

G.S. 122C-143.2

.

If an area authority fails to complete actions necessary for the development of a Memorandum of Agreement, fails to file required reports within the time limit set by the Secretary, or fails to comply with any other requirements specified in this Article, the Secretary may:

Delay payments; and

With written notification of cause and subject to an appeal as provided by

G.S. 122C-151.2

, reduce or deny payment of funds. Restoration of funds upon compliance is within the discretion of the Secretary.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 25; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 19; 1993, c. 321, s. 220(l).

§ 122C-151.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 220(n), as amended by Session Laws 1993 (Regular Session, 1994), c. 591, s. 7.

§ 122C-151.2.
Appeal by area authorities and county programs.

The area authority or county program may appeal to the Commission any action regarding rules under the jurisdiction of the Commission or rules under the joint jurisdiction of the Commission and the Secretary.

The area authority or county program may appeal to the Secretary any action regarding rules under the jurisdiction of the Secretary.

Appeals shall be conducted according to rules adopted by the Commission and Secretary and in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, ss. 7, 19; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; c. 614, s. 7; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 720, s. 3; 1993, c. 321, s. 220(m); 2001-437, s. 1.17(a).

§ 122C-151.3.
Dispute with area authorities or county programs.

An area authority or county program shall establish written procedures for resolving disputes over decisions of an area authority or county program that may be appealed to the State MH/DD/SA Appeals Panel under

G.S. 122C-151.4

. The procedures shall be informal and shall provide an opportunity for those who dispute the decision to present their position.

This section does not apply to LME/MCOs, enrollees, applicants, providers of emergency services, or network providers subject to Chapter 108D of the General Statutes.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(o); 2001-437, s. 1.17(b); 2013-397, s. 2.

§ 122C-151.4.
Appeal to State MH/DD/SA Appeals Panel.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-88, s. 16(d), effective July 22, 2021.

(1a)

Client. — An individual who is admitted to or receiving public services from an area facility. The term includes the client’s personal representative or designee.

(1b)

Contract. — A contract with an area authority or county program to provide services, other than personal services, to clients and other recipients of services.

Contractor. — A person that has a contract or that had a contract during the current fiscal year.

Former contractor. — A person that had a contract during the previous fiscal year.

Panel. — The State MH/DD/SA Appeals Panel established under this section.

Appeals Panel. — The State MH/DD/SA Appeals Panel is established. The Panel shall consist of three members appointed by the Secretary. The Secretary shall determine the qualifications of the Panel members. Panel members serve at the pleasure of the Secretary.

Persons That May Appeal. — The following persons may appeal to the Panel after having exhausted the appeals process at the appropriate area authority or county program:

A contractor or a former contractor that claims that an area authority or county program is not acting or has not acted within applicable State law or rules in denying the contractor’s application for endorsement or in imposing a particular requirement on the contractor on fulfillment of the contract.

A contractor or a former contractor that claims that a requirement of the contract substantially compromises the ability of the contractor to fulfill the contract.

A contractor or former contractor that claims that an area authority or county program has acted arbitrarily and capriciously in reducing funding for the type of services provided or formerly provided by the contractor or former contractor.

A client or a person who was a client in the previous fiscal year, who claims that an area authority or county program has acted arbitrarily and capriciously in reducing funding for the type of services provided or formerly provided to the client directly by the area authority or county program.

A person that claims that an area authority or county program did not comply with a State law or a rule adopted by the Secretary or the Commission in developing the plans and budgets of the area authority or county program and that the failure to comply has adversely affected the ability of the person to participate in the development of the plans and budgets.

Hearing. — All members of the Panel shall hear an appeal to the Panel. An appeal shall be filed with the Panel within the time required by the Secretary and shall be heard by the Panel within the time required by the Secretary. A hearing shall be conducted at the place determined in accordance with the rules adopted by the Secretary. A hearing before the Panel shall be informal; no sworn testimony shall be taken and the rules of evidence do not apply. The person that appeals to the Panel has the burden of proof. The Panel shall not stay a decision of an area authority during an appeal to the Panel.

Decision. — The Panel shall make a written decision on each appeal to the Panel within the time set by the Secretary. A decision may direct a contractor, an area authority, or a county program to take an action or to refrain from taking an action, but it shall not require a party to the appeal to pay any amount except payment due under the contract. In making a decision, the Panel shall determine the course of action that best protects or benefits the clients of the area authority or county program. If a party to an appeal fails to comply with a decision of the Panel and the Secretary determines that the failure deprives clients of the area authority or county program of a type of needed service, the Secretary may use funds previously allocated to the area authority or county program to provide the service.

Chapter 150B Appeal. — A person that is dissatisfied with a decision of the Panel may commence a contested case under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-2(1b), an area authority or county program is considered an agency for purposes of the limited appeal authorized by this section. If the need to first appeal to the Panel is waived by the Secretary, a contractor may appeal directly to the Office of Administrative Hearings after having exhausted the appeals process at the appropriate area authority or county program.

Limitation of Applicability. — This section does not apply to LME/MCOs, enrollees, applicants, providers of emergency services, or network providers subject to Chapter 108D of the General Statutes.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 220(o); 2001-437, s. 1.17(c); 2008-107, s. 10.15A(h); 2011-398, s. 40; 2012-66, s. 3; 2013-397, s. 3; 2021-88, s. 16(d).

Community Support Providers Appeals Process.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.15A(e1)-(e4), as amended by Session Laws 2009-526, s. 2(c), and Session Laws 2009-550, s. 1.1(c), provides: “(e1) For the purpose of expediting the resolution of community support provider appeals and thereby saving State and federal funds that are paid for services that are found to be unnecessary or otherwise ineligible for payment, the Department shall implement on a temporary basis a community support provider appeals process. The process shall be a substitute for informal provider appeals at the Department level and formal provider appeals by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The community support provider appeals process shall apply to a community support services provider:

“(1) Who is aggrieved by a decision of the Department to reduce, deny, recoup, or recover reimbursement for community support services, or to deny, suspend, or revoke a provider agreement to provide community support services.

“(2) Whose endorsement has been withdrawn or whose application for endorsement has been denied by a local management entity.

“(e2) The community support provider appeals process shall be developed and implemented as follows:

“(1) A hearing under this section shall be commenced by filing a petition with the chief hearings clerk of the Department within 30 days of the mailing of the notice by the Department of the action giving rise to the contested case. The petition shall identify the petitioner, be signed by the party or representative of the party, and shall describe the agency action giving rise to the contested case. As used in this section, ‘file or filing’ means to place the paper or item to be filed into the care and custody of the chief hearings clerk of the Department and acceptance thereof by the chief hearings clerk, except that the hearing officer may permit the papers to be filed with the hearing officer, in which event the hearing officer shall note thereon the filing date. The Department shall supply forms for use in these contested cases.

“(2) If there is a timely request for an appeal, the Department shall promptly designate a hearing officer who shall hold an evidentiary hearing. The hearing officer shall conduct the hearing according to applicable federal law and regulations and shall ensure that:

“a. Notice of the hearing is given not less than 15 days before the hearing. The notice shall state the date, hour, and place of the hearing and shall be deemed to have been given on the date that a copy of the notice is mailed, via certified mail, to the address provided by the petitioner in the petition for hearing.

“b. The hearing is held in Wake County, except that the hearing officer may, take testimony and receive evidence by telephone or other electronic means. The petitioner and the petitioner’s legal representative may appear before the hearing officer in Wake County.

“c. Discovery is no more extensive or formal than that required by federal law and regulations applicable to the hearings. Prior to and during the hearing, a provider representative shall have adequate opportunity to examine the provider’s own case file. No later than five days before the date of the hearing, each party to a contested case shall identify each witness that the party intends to call.

“(3) The hearing officer shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations and regulate the conduct of the hearing. The following shall apply to hearings held pursuant to this section:

“a. At the hearing, the parties may present such sworn evidence, law, and regulations as are relevant to the issues in the case.

“b. The petitioner and the respondent agency each have a right to be represented by a person of his choice, including an attorney obtained at the party’s own expense.

“c. The petitioner and the respondent agency shall each have the right to cross-examine witnesses as well as make a closing argument summarizing his view of the case and the law.

“d. The appeal hearing shall be recorded. If a petition for judicial review is filed the Department shall include a copy of the recording of the hearing as part of the official record. The recording of the appeal hearing may be erased or otherwise destroyed 180 days after the final decision is mailed as provided in G.S. 108A-79(i)(5).

“(4) The hearing officer shall decide the case based upon a preponderance of the evidence, giving deference to the demonstrated knowledge and expertise of the agency as provided in G.S. 150B-34(a). The hearing officer shall prepare a proposal for the decision, citing relevant law, regulations, and evidence, which shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency.

“(5) The petitioner and the respondent agency shall have 15 days from the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision to present written arguments in opposition to or in support of the proposal for decision to the designated official of the Department who will make the final decision. If neither written arguments are presented, nor extension of time granted by the final agency decision maker for good cause, within 15 days of the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision, the proposal for decision becomes final. If written arguments are presented, such arguments shall be considered and the final decision shall be rendered. The final decision shall be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition. This time limit may be extended by agreement of the parties or by final agency decision maker, for good cause shown. The final decision shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency. In the absence of a petition for judicial review filed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the final decision shall be binding upon the petitioner and the Department.

“(6) A petitioner who is dissatisfied with the final decision of the Department may file, within 30 days of the service of the decision, a petition for judicial review in the Superior Court of Wake County or of the county from which the case arose. The judicial review shall be conducted according to Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(7) In the event of a conflict between federal law or regulations and State law or regulations, federal law or regulations shall control. This section applies to all petitions that are filed by a Medicaid community support services provider on or after July 1, 2008, and for all Medicaid community support services provider petitions that have been filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings previous to July 1, 2008, but for which a hearing on the merits has not been commenced prior to that date. The requirement that the agency decision must be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition for hearing shall not apply to (i) community support services provider petitions that were filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings or (ii) requests for a hearing under the Department’s informal settlement process prior to the effective date of this act. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall transfer all cases affected by this section to the Department of Health and Human Services within 30 days of the effective date of this section. This act preempts the existing informal appeal process and reconsideration review process at the Department of Health and Human Services and the existing appeal process at the Office of Administrative Hearings with regard to all appeals filed by Medicaid community support services providers under the Medical Assistance program.

“(e3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services may, pursuant to its statutory authority or federal Medicaid requirements, suspend the endorsement or Medicaid participation of a provider of community support services pending a final agency decision based on a fair hearing of the provider’s appeal filed with the Department under its community support provider appeal process. A provider of community support services whose endorsement, Medicaid participation, or services have been suspended is not entitled to payment during the period the appeal is pending, and the Department shall make no such payment to the provider during that period. If the final agency decision is in favor of the provider, the Department shall remove the suspension, commence payment for provider services, and reimburse the provider for payments withheld during the period of appeal. Contracts between the Department or a local management entity and the provider shall contain a provision indicating the circumstances under which a provider may appeal an agency decision and giving notice of the suspension of payments to the provider while the appeal is pending. This subsection applies to community support provider appeals pending in the Department of Health and Human Services or the Office of Administrative Hearings, as applicable, on and after July 1, 2008.

“(e4) The Department’s community support provider appeals process established under this section shall expire July 1, 2010. The Department shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on March 1, 2009, October 1, 2009, and March 1, 2010, on the effectiveness and efficiency of the community support provider appeals process.”